Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-506
Unlawful discrimination; contracts void.

All contracts or agreements made in violation of any of the provisions of sections 59-501 to 59-503 shall be void.

Laws 1939, c. 77, § 3, p. 315;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 59-525;

R.S.1943, § 59-506.